apertium-fin-eng.eng.lexc
LEXICON Propers

de%<np%>:de # ;
Van%<np%>:Van # ;

Atlantic%<np%>:Atlantic PROPN ;
Eeva%<np%>:Eeva PROPN ;
Facebook%<np%>:Facebook PROPN ;
France%<np%>:France PROPN ;
Helsing%<np%>:Helsing PROPN ;
Helsinki%<np%>:Helsinki PROPN ;
Jaakko%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Jaakko PROPN ; ! ""
James%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:James PROPN_JAMES ; ! ""
Korea%<np%>:Korea PROPN ;
Kuuskoski%<np%>:Kuuskoski PROPN ;
Mari%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Mari PROPN ; ! ""
Mary%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:Mary PROPN ; ! ""
Moses%<np%>:Moses PROPN ;
Pia%<np%>:Pia PROPN ;
Päivi%<np%>:Päivi PROPN ;
Stockmann%<np%>:Stockmann PROPN ;
Venäläinen%<np%>:Venäläinen PROPN ;


LEXICON Conjunctions

and%<cnjcoo%>:and # ; ! ""
but%<cnjcoo%>:but # ; ! ""
or%<cnjcoo%>:or # ; ! ""
that%<cnjsub%>:that # ; ! ""
because%<cnjsub%>:because # ; !
therefore%<cnjcoo%>:therefore # ;
unless%<cnjsub%>:unless # ; !
until%<cnjcoo%>:until # ;
if%<cnjsub%>:if # ;

LEXICON A_OLD
0 # ;
%<comp%>:er # ;
%<sup%>:est # ;

LEXICON A_BIG
0 # ;
%<comp%>:ger # ;
%<sup%>:gest # ;

LEXICON A_HAPPY
0:y # ;
%<comp%>:ier # ;
%<sup%>:iest # ;

LEXICON A_NICE
0:e # ;
%<comp%>:er # ;
%<sup%>:est # ;

LEXICON Interjections

hi%<ij%>:hi # ;
no%<ij%>:no # ; 

LEXICON Numerals
one%<num%>:one # ;
two%<num%>:two # ; ! ""
three%<num%>:three # ;
five%<num%>:five # ; ! ""
six%<num%>:six # ; ! ""
0   Digits  ;

LEXICON Digits
%0  Digits  ;
1   Digits  ;
2   Digits  ;
3   Digits  ;
4   Digits  ;
5   Digits  ;
6   Digits  ;
7   Digits  ;
8   Digits  ;
9   Digits  ;
0   Digits_final    ;
.   Digits_final    ;

LEXICON Digits_final
1%<num%>:1 # ;
2%<num%>:2 # ;
3%<num%>:3 # ;
4%<num%>:4 # ;
5%<num%>:5 # ;
6%<num%>:6 # ;
7%<num%>:7 # ;
8%<num%>:8 # ;
9%<num%>:9 # ;
%0%<num%>:%0 # ;

 LEXICON Punctuation
!===================!


%.%<sent%>:%. # ;
%.%.%<sent%>:%.%. # ;
%.%.%.%<sent%>:%.%.%. # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%’%<apos%>:%’ # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%"%<rquot%>:%" # ;
%"%<lquot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%\%<sent%>:%\ # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;

LEXICON Adjectives
big%<adj%>%<sint%>:big A_BIG ; ! ""
cold%<adj%>%<sint%>:cold A_OLD ; ! ""
dear%<adj%>:dear A_OLD ;
funny%<adj%>%<sint%>:funn A_HAPPY ; ! ""
happy%<adj%>:happ A_HAPPY ;
happy%<adj%>%<sint%>:happ A_HAPPY ; ! ""
merry%<adj%>:merr A_HAPPY ;
nice%<adj%>%<sint%>:nic A_NICE ; ! ""
old%<adj%>:old A_OLD ;
old%<adj%>%<sint%>:old A_OLD ; ! ""
safe%<adj%>:saf A_NICE ;
small%<adj%>%<sint%>:small A_OLD ; ! ""
small%<adj%>:small A_OLD ;
warm%<adj%>%<sint%>:warm A_OLD ; ! ""
